Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1184.
do enact as follows:SB1184,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB1184,28Section 2. 20.285 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:SB1184,2,10920.285 (1) (cm) Journalism fellowship program. The amounts in the schedule 10for the journalism fellowship program under s. 36.25 (56).SB1184,311Section 3. 36.25 (56) of the statutes is created to read:SB1184,2,141236.25 (56) Journalism fellowship program. (a) The board shall establish 13a journalism fellowship program that matches individuals with journalism degrees 14to local newsrooms.SB1184,2,1715(b) The board shall establish a committee to select participating fellows and 16newsrooms for the program and to match these fellows and newsrooms. This 17selection committee shall consist of the following:SB1184,2,19181. Three members who hold a faculty position in the system in the field of 19journalism or communications, appointed by the system president.SB1184,2,21202. Two members employed in the journalism industry, appointed by a 21majority of the members specified in subd. 1.SB1184,3,622(c) The selection committee shall evaluate applications to be a fellow and to be 23a participating newsroom under the program. The application shall require each 1applicant to demonstrate how the applicant’s participation in the program will help 2increase access to high quality local journalism, bolster media literacy, meet state 3residents’ civic information needs, or a combination of these. To be eligible for a 4fellowship, an applicant must have completed a 2-year or 4-year degree in 5journalism, media, communications, or a similar program at an institution of 6higher education.SB1184,3,97(d) Based on the recommendations of the selection committee, the board shall 8annually award 25 one-year fellowships providing each fellow with a salary of 9$40,000.SB1184,3,1110(e) The program under this subsection shall be funded from the appropriation 11account under s. 20.285 (1) (cm).SB1184,412Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.SB1184,3,1613(1) Notwithstanding s. 36.115 (9), the authorized FTE positions for the 14University of Wisconsin System are increased by 25.0 GPR positions on July 1, 152026, to be funded from the appropriation under s. 20.285 (1) (cm), for the 16journalism fellows under s. 36.25 (56).SB1184,3,1717